Arkansas, session 2025, HB1270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Prescribed Pediatric
Extended Care Pilot Program.
(a)(1) The Department of Human Services shall establish a Prescribed
Pediatric Extended Care Pilot Program to provide specialized, nonresidential
medical care for children with medically complex conditions.
(2) The pilot program shall:
(A) Operate in three (3) counties, strategically selected
within the most densely populated counties of the state, as determined by the
department;
(B) Function under a Section 1115 Medicaid Demonstration
Waiver, allowing the Arkansas Medicaid Program to cover prescribed pediatric
extended care services as an alternative to home health and private duty
*JMB269*
04-01-2025 10:01:21 JMB269

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1270
nursing; and
(C) Focus on the following objectives:
(i) Expand access to cost-effective, community-based
pediatric extended care for children with medically complex conditions;
(ii) Reduce avoidable hospitalizations and emergency
department visits for enrolled children;
(iii) Provide caregiver training and support
services to families, improving long-term health outcomes; and
(iv) Assess the feasibility of a permanent statewide
pediatric extended care program.
(b)(1) The department shall apply for a Section 1115 Medicaid
Demonstration Waiver to secure federal approval for the pilot program within
six (6) months of the effective date of this act.
(2) The waiver application shall outline:
(A) The eligibility criteria for participating children,
including children who require continuous skilled nursing care or therapeutic
interventions;
(B) The Medicaid reimbursement mechanisms for prescribed
pediatric extended care services;
(C) Methods to evaluate cost savings and health outcomes;
and
(D) Any necessary adjustments to existing Medicaid
benefits, including private duty nursing and home health services.
(c) Upon approval by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services, the
department shall implement the pilot program no later than January 1, 2027.
(d) To qualify for services under the pilot program, a child shall:
(1) Be under twenty-one (21) years of age;
(2) Be medically dependent or technologically dependent, as
certified by a licensed physician;
(3) Require a level of care that would otherwise be provided in
a hospital or skilled nursing facility; and
(4) Have a caregiver who consents to participation and engages
in required training.
(e)(1) The department shall conduct an annual evaluation of the pilot
program, assessing:
(A) Health outcomes of enrolled children;
04-01-2025 10:01:21 JMB269

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1270
(B) Cost-effectiveness compared to traditional Medicaid
services; and
(C) Caregiver satisfaction and burden reduction.
(2) A comprehensive final report shall be submitted to the
Governor and the General Assembly by December 31, 2030, with recommendations
on whether to expand, modify, or terminate the pilot program.
(f)(1) The pilot program shall operate for a period of five (5) years
unless extended by the General Assembly.
(2) If the department determines that the pilot program is not
meeting its intended goals, the department may submit a request to Centers
for Medicare & Medicaid Services to modify or terminate the waiver before the
scheduled expiration date.
(g) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement the pilot
program, including:
(1) Licensing and operational standards for prescribed pediatric
extended care facilities;
(2) Medicaid reimbursement rates and provider enrollment
requirements; and
(3) Data collection protocols for evaluating the pilot program
effectiveness.
(h) The department may collaborate with pediatric hospitals, home
health providers, and community organizations to facilitate the pilot
program’s success.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this state lacks sufficient
alternative care settings for children with medically complex conditions;
that due to lack of sufficient alternative care settings, children with
medically complex conditions often have unnecessary hospitalizations, which
results in increased expenditures to the state and in the Arkansas Medicaid
Program; that unnecessary hospitalizations in children can lead to
preventable harm, including infections; and that this act is immediately
necessary because increasing alternative care settings for children with
medically complex conditions protects the health of the children of this
state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
04-01-2025 10:01:21 JMB269

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1270
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Pilkington



























04-01-2025 10:01:21 JMB269